Washington statutes.
RCW 35.81.040

Formulation of workable program.

A municipality for the purposes of this chapter may formulate a workable program for using appropriate private and public resources to eliminate, and prevent the development or spread of, blighted areas, to encourage needed community rehabilitation, to provide for the redevelopment of such areas, or to undertake the activities, or other feasible municipal activities as may be suitably employed to achieve the objectives of the workable program. The workable program may include, without limitation, provision for: The prevention of the spread of blight into areas of the municipality which are free from blight through diligent enforcement of housing, zoning, and occupancy controls and standards; the rehabilitation of blighted areas or portions thereof by replanning, removing congestion, providing parks, playgrounds and other public improvements, by encouraging voluntary rehabilitation and by compelling the repair and rehabilitation of deteriorated or deteriorating structures; the replacement of housing that is lost as a result of community renewal activities within a community renewal area; the clearance and redevelopment of blighted areas or portions thereof; and the reduction of unemployment and poverty within the community renewal area by providing financial or technical assistance to a person or public body that is used to create or retain jobs, a substantial portion of which, as determined by the municipality, shall be for persons of low income.

[ 2002 c 218 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.81.040. Prior: 1957 c 42 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—Construction—2002 c 218: See notes following RCW 35.81.005.